src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROP_KIT_FEM
+Sem/Fem: NMN_KIT ;
+Sem/Fem+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/PhonInfl:%>TLoss NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;

LEXICON PROP_OSH_FEM
+Sem/Fem: NMN_OSH ;

!LEXICON PROP_TESHTE_FEM
! PROP_PANGO_FEM ;

!LEXICON PROP_TINGE_FEM
! PROP_PANGO_FEM ;

!LEXICON PROP_PANGO_FEM
!+Sem/Fem: NMN_PANGO ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_FEM
+Sem/Fem: NMN_KUDO ;


LEXICON PROP_OSH_PATRMAL
!ович, ьевич,
!+Err/Orth-colloq
+Sem/Mal-Patr: N_OSH-Derivation ;
+Sem/Mal-Patr: N_OSH-Def-Declension ;
+Sem/Mal-Patr: _OSH-Indef-Declension ;
+Sem/Mal-Patr: N_OSH-Poss-Declension-CX ;
+Sem/Mal-Patr+Err/Orth-colloq:%{ichPat%} N_OSH-Derivation ;
+Sem/Mal-Patr+Err/Orth-colloq:%{ichPat%} N_OSH-Def-Declension ;
+Sem/Mal-Patr+Err/Orth-colloq:%{ichPat%} _OSH-Indef-Declension ;
+Sem/Mal-Patr+Err/Orth-colloq:%{ichPat%} N_OSH-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM
+Sem/Fem-Patr: N_KUDO-Derivation ;
+Sem/Fem-Patr: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
+Sem/Fem-Patr: _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
+Sem/Fem-Patr: N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PROP_NIZE
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>зэ K ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:%>нзэ K ;
+Sg+Dat+PxSg3:%>нстэнь K ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь K ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>нть K ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>нтень K ;

!! DECLENSION LIMITATIONS

LEXICON PROP_KUDO-PL
: NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
: _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
: N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SUB
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth: PROP_KUDO ;

!LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SH
!+Use/Short: PROP_KUDO ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
