src/fst/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Ильич:Ильич PROP_OSH_PATRMAL  "" ;
Кузьмич:Кузьмич PROP_OSH_PATRMAL  "" ;
Петрович:Петрович PROP_OSH_PATRMAL  "" ;
Прокопыч:Прокопыч PROP_OSH_PATRMAL  "" ;
Северьянович:Северьянович PROP_OSH_PATRMAL  "" ;
Семёнович:Семёнович PROP_OSH_PATRMAL  "" ;
курцят:курця PROP_KUDO-PL  "XX" ;
